es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Skateboarding > Monopatines completos: Patinetas clásicas; Cruisers; Patinetas eléctricas; Longboards; Mini-Cruisers; Tablas de montaña; Tablas de forma especial
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jazda na deskorolce > Kompletne deskorolki: Deskorolki klasyczne; Deskorolki typu cruiser; Deskorolki elektryczne; Longboardy; Deskorolki typu mini-cruiser; Deskorolki górskie; Deskorolki o specjalnym kształcie
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Skateboarden > Komplette Skateboards: Klassische Skateboards; Cruiser; Elektro-Skateboards; Longboards; Mini-Cruiser; Mountainboards; Boards mit besonderer Form
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Skate > Skates completos: Skates clássicos; Cruisers; Skates elétricos; Longboards; Mini-Cruisers; Mountainboards; Pranchas de formato especial
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Скейтборд > Цели скейтбордове: Класически скейтбордове; Крузъри; Електрически скейтбордове; Лонгбордове; Миникрузъри; Маунтинбордове; Дъски със специална форма
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Rullalautailu > Täydet rullalaudat: Klassiset skeittilaudat; Cruiser-skeittilaudat; Sähköskeittilaudat; Longboard-laudat; Mini Cruiser -skeittilaudat; Maastolaudat; Erikoismuodon laudat
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > スケートボード > コンプリート スケートボード: クラシックスケートボード; クルーザー; 電動スケートボード; ロングボード; ミニクルーザー; マウンテンボード; 特殊形状ボード
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Skateboarding > Skateboards complets: Skateboards classiques; Cruisers; Skateboards électriques; Longboards; Mini-cruisers; Mountainboards; Planches de forme spéciale
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 스케이트보딩 > 컴플릿 스케이트보드: 클래식 스케이트보드; 순항 보트; 전동 스케이트보드; 롱 보드; 미니 크루저; 마운틴 보드; 특수 모양 보드
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Скейтбординг > Скейтборды: Классические скейтборды; Круизеры; Электроскейтборды; Лонгборды; Мини-круизеры; Маунтинборды; Скейтборды необычной формы
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Skejtanje > Skateboardi: Klasični skateboardi; Kruzer skateboardi; Električni skateboardi; Longboardi; Mini-kruzer skateboardi; Mountainboardi; Skateboardi posebnog oblika
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trượt ván > Ván trượt hoàn chỉnh: Ván trượt cổ điển; Ván trượt dài; Ván trượt điện; Ván trượt dài; Ván trượt nhỏ; Ván trượt đồi núi; Kiểu dáng ván trượt đặc biệt
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Rolkanje > Že sestavljene rolke: Klasične rolke; Cruiser rolke; Električne rolke; Longboardi; Mini-cruiser rolke; Mountainboardi; Rolke posebnih oblik
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Σκέιτμπορντ > Πλήρη σκέιτμπορντ: Κλασικά σκέιτμπορντ; Τροχοσανίδες τύπου cruiser; Ηλεκτρικά σκέιτμπορντ; Longboards; Τροχοσανίδες τύπου mini cruiser; Mountainboards; Σκέιτμπορντ ειδικού σχήματος
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Skateboarding > Komplette skateboards: Klassiske skateboards; Cruisers; Elektriske skateboards; Longboards; Mini-cruisers; Mountainboards; Special shapeboards
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Skateboarding > Komplette skateboard: Klassiske skateboards; Cruisere; Elektriske skateboard; Langbrett; Mini-cruisere; Fjellbrett; Brett med spesialform
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Skateboarding > Complete Skateboards: Classic Skateboards; Cruisers; Electric Skateboards; Longboards; Mini-Cruisers; Mountainboards; Special Shape Boards
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Skateboarding > Plăci complete de skateboard: Plăci skateboard clasice; Plăci cruiser; Skateboarduri electrice; Plăci longboard; Plăci mini-cruiser; Plăci mountainboard; Plăci cu formă specială
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Gördeszkázás > Komplett gördeszkák: Klasszikus gördeszkák; Cirkálók; Elektromos gördeszkák; Longboardok; Mini cirkálók; Hegyi deszkák; Különleges alakú deszkák
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Skateboarden > Complete skateboards: Klassieke skateboards; Cruisers; Elektrische skateboards; Longboards; Mini-cruisers; Mountainboards; Boards met een speciale vorm
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Riedlenčių sportas > Sukomplektuotos riedlentės: Klasikinės riedlentės; Kreiserinės riedlentės; Elektrinės riedlentės; Ilgosios riedlentės; Minikreiserinės riedlentės; Kalnų riedlentės; Ypatingos formos riedlentės
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Skateboardové vybavení > Kompletní skateboardy: Klasické skateboardy; Cruisery; Elektrické skateboardy; Longboardy; Mini-cruisery; Mountainboardy; Boardy speciálního tvaru
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Skate > Skates completos: Skates clássicos; Cruisers; Skates elétricos; Shapes longboard; MiniCruisers; Shapes speed; Pranchas de formatos especiais
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kaykay Tahtası > Komple Kaykaylar: Klasik Kaykaylar; Cruiser; Elektrikli kaykaylar; Longboard; Mini Cruiser'lar; Mountainboard; Özel Şekilli Kaykaylar
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Skateboardåkning > Kompletta skateboards: Klassiska skateboards; Kryssare; Eldrivna skateboards; Longboards; Minikryssare; Mountainboards; Specialutformade brädor
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การเล่นสเกตบอร์ด > สเกตบอร์ดแบบประกอบสำเร็จ: สเก็ตบอร์ดแบบคลาสสิก; ครูสเซอร์; สเกตบอร์ดไฟฟ้า; ลองบอร์ด; มินิครูสเซอร์; สเกตบอร์ดภูเขา; กระดานรูปทรงพิเศษ
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 滑板用品 > 技術板: 技術板; 復古街式板; 電動滑板; 長板; 迷你交通板; 越野板; 特殊形狀板
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Skateboarding > Skateboard completi: Skateboard classici; Cruiser; Skateboard elettrici; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Tavole dalla forma speciale
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 滑板 > 完整滑板: 经典滑板; 沙滩车; 电动滑板; 长板; 迷你沙滩车; 越野滑板; 异形板
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Skateboarding > Hotové skateboardy: Klasické skateboardy; Cruisery; Elektrické skateboardy; Longboardy; Mini cruisery; Mountainboardy; Špeciálne tvarované boardy